apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="atr/ast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīšu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsim</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>adīsiet</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsit</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīs</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adām</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adāt</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odam</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odat</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes" c="No idea what this is :/">
        <p>
          <l>ašanos</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes" c="No idea what this is :/">
        <p>
          <l>azdamies</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes" c="No idea what this is :/">
        <p>
          <l>azdamās</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odot</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odam</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
